Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1117.
do enact as follows:SB1117,11Section 1. 5.10 of the statutes is amended to read:SB1117,2,1025.10 Presidential electors. Although the names of the electors do not 3appear on the ballot and no reference is made to them, a vote for the president and 4vice president named on the ballot is a vote for the electors of the candidates for 5whom an elector’s vote is cast. Under chs. 5 to 12, all references to the presidential 6election, the casting of votes and the canvassing of votes for president, or for 7president and vice president, mean votes for them through their pledged 8presidential electors. If the compact under s. 5.11 governs the election of 9presidential electors, the references mean votes for the presidential electors who 10represent the candidates.SB1117,211Section 2. 5.11 of the statutes is created to read:SB1117,2,15125.11 Interstate compact on election of president and vice president. 13The Agreement Among the States to Elect the President by National Popular Vote 14is enacted into law and entered into with all other states legally joining in it in 15substantially the following form:SB1117,2,1716AGREEMENT AMONG THE STATES TO ELECT THE PRESIDENT BY 17NATIONAL POPULAR VOTESB1117,3,21(1) Article I — Membership. Any state of the United States and the District 2of Columbia may become a member of this agreement by enacting this agreement.SB1117,3,53(2) Article II — Right of the people in member states to vote for 4president and vice president. Each member state shall conduct a statewide 5popular election for president and vice president of the United States.SB1117,3,126(3) Article III — Manner of appointing presidential electors in 7member states. (a) Prior to the time set by law for the meeting and voting by the 8presidential electors, the chief election official of each member state shall 9determine the number of votes for each presidential slate in each state of the United 10States and in the District of Columbia in which votes have been cast in a statewide 11popular election and shall add such votes together to produce a “national popular 12vote total” for each presidential slate.SB1117,3,1513(b) The chief election official of each member state shall designate the 14presidential slate with the largest national popular vote total as the “national 15popular vote winner.”SB1117,3,1816(c) The presidential elector certifying official of each member state shall 17certify the appointment in that official’s own state of the elector slate nominated in 18that state in association with the national popular vote winner.SB1117,3,2319(d) At least 6 days before the day fixed by law for the meeting and voting by the 20presidential electors, each member state shall make a final determination of the 21number of popular votes cast in the state for each presidential slate and shall 22communicate an official statement of such determination within 24 hours to the 23chief election official of each other member state.SB1117,4,41(e) The chief election official of each member state shall treat as conclusive an 2official statement containing the number of popular votes in a state for each 3presidential slate made by the day established by federal law for making a state’s 4final determination conclusive as to the counting of electoral votes by Congress.SB1117,4,85(f) In event of a tie for the national popular vote winner, the presidential 6elector certifying official of each member state shall certify the appointment of the 7elector slate nominated in association with the presidential slate receiving the 8largest number of popular votes within that official’s own state.SB1117,4,179(g) If, for any reason, the number of presidential electors nominated in a 10member state in association with the national popular vote winner is less than or 11greater than that state’s number of electoral votes, the presidential candidate on 12the presidential slate that has been designated as the national popular vote winner 13shall have the power to nominate the presidential electors for that state and that 14state’s presidential elector certifying official shall certify the appointment of such 15nominees. The chief election official of each member state shall immediately 16release to the public all vote counts or statements of votes as they are determined or 17obtained.SB1117,4,2018(h) This article shall govern the appointment of presidential electors in each 19member state in any year in which this agreement is, on July 20, in effect in states 20cumulatively possessing a majority of the electoral votes.SB1117,5,221(4) Article IV — Other provisions. (a) This agreement shall take effect 22when states cumulatively possessing a majority of the electoral votes have enacted 1this agreement in substantially the same form, and the enactments by such states 2have taken effect in each state.SB1117,5,63(b) Any member state may withdraw from this agreement, except that a 4withdrawal occurring 6 months or less before the end of a president’s term shall not 5become effective until a president or vice president shall have been qualified to 6serve the next term.SB1117,5,107(c) The chief executive of each member state shall promptly notify the chief 8executive of all other states of when this agreement has been enacted and has taken 9effect in that official’s state, when the state has withdrawn from this agreement, 10and when this agreement takes effect generally.SB1117,5,1111(d) This agreement shall terminate if the electoral college is abolished.SB1117,5,1312(e) If any provision of this agreement is held invalid, the remaining provisions 13shall not be affected.SB1117,5,1414(5) Article V — Definitions. For purposes of this agreement:SB1117,5,1615(a) “Chief election official” shall mean the state official or body that is 16authorized to certify the total number of popular votes for each presidential slate.SB1117,5,1817(b) “Chief executive” shall mean the governor of a state of the United States or 18the mayor of the District of Columbia.SB1117,5,2119(c) “Elector slate” shall mean a slate of candidates who have been nominated 20in a state for the position of presidential elector in association with a presidential 21slate.SB1117,5,2322(d) “Presidential elector” shall mean an elector for president and vice 23president of the United States.SB1117,6,31(e) “Presidential elector certifying official” shall mean the state official or 2body that is authorized to certify the appointment of the state’s presidential 3electors.SB1117,6,84(f) “Presidential slate” shall mean a slate of 2 persons, the first of whom has 5been nominated as a candidate for president of the United States and the 2nd of 6whom has been nominated as a candidate for vice president of the United States, or 7any legal successors to such persons, regardless of whether both names appear on 8the ballot presented to the voter in a particular state.SB1117,6,109(g) “State” shall mean a state of the United States and the District of 10Columbia.SB1117,6,1311(h) “Statewide popular election” shall mean a general election in which votes 12are cast for presidential slates by individual voters and counted on a statewide 13basis.SB1117,314Section 3. 5.12 of the statutes is created to read:SB1117,6,20155.12 Governor to notify reference bureau when agreement is in 16effect. Whenever the governor notifies the chief executives of the other states that 17the agreement ratified under s. 5.11 is in effect in this state, or that this state has 18withdrawn from the agreement, the governor shall concurrently notify the 19legislative reference bureau that the agreement is in effect or is no longer in effect in 20this state.SB1117,421Section 4. 7.70 (5) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1117,7,8227.70 (5) (b) For presidential electors, the commission shall prepare a 23certificate showing the determination of the results of the canvass and the names of 1the persons elected as presidential electors or, if the compact under s. 5.11 governs 2the appointment of presidential electors, the names of the persons who are certified 3as this state’s presidential electors in accordance with s. 5.11, and the governor 4shall sign, affix the great seal of the state, and transmit the certificate by registered 5mail to the U.S. administrator of general services national archive in the manner 6specified under federal law. The governor shall also prepare 6 duplicate originals of 7such certificate and deliver them to one of the presidential electors on or before the 8first Monday after the 2nd Wednesday in December.SB1117,59Section 5. Effective dates. This act takes effect on the day after 10publication, except as follows:SB1117,7,1311(1) The treatment of ss. 5.10 and 7.70 (5) (b) takes effect upon notification by 12the governor to the legislative reference bureau that the agreement ratified by this 13state under s. 5.11 is in effect.SB1117,7,1414